Rhode Island, session 2025, SB494.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-6-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-6 entitled "Ordinances" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
45-6-2. Imposition of penalties for ordinance violations.
(a) Town and city councils may impose penalties for the violation of ordinances and
regulations, not exceeding in amount five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment not exceeding
thirty (30) days in some jail or house of correction, and/or require restitution in cases involving
property damage or personal injury in an amount up to twenty-five hundred dollars ($2,500) and/or
require community restitution for a not-for-profit entity for not more than fifty (50) hours for any
one offense, to be prosecuted by some officer appointed for that purpose, and to be recovered to
the use of the town or city, or of the person or persons, and in the proportions, that the councils in
their ordinances and regulations designate.
(b) Whenever a municipality issues a fine for a violation of an ordinance, those fines shall
be a lien against the real property owned by the violator located within the municipality. If the fine
is not paid by the violator within ninety (90) days of issuance of the fine, a lien shall be recorded
with the records of land evidence of the municipality where the violating property is located and
the lien shall also incur interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per year, from the date of
recording. The costs incurred by the municipality to remediate issues caused by the ordinance
violation(s), along with the unpaid fine, shall be added to the amount of taxes due on the real estate
where the violation(s) was located, and the tax collector of that municipality shall include those

amounts on tax bills owed by the property owner.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001554
========
LC001554 - Page 2 of 3